test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-salvata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - salvata: # Verb 'to close / sulkea, salvata' - full paradigm
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salbuan
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: salbuat
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: salbuau
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: salbuammo
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: salbuatto
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: salvatah
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: salbua
                  
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: salbain
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: salbait
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: salbai
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: salbaimmo
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: salbaitto
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: salvattih
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: salvannuh
     salvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: salvattu
